Massachusetts, session 194th, H2946.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 4 of Chapter 32 Section 4 (1) is hereby amended by adding the following section:
(t) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, a member in service who
took an unpaid leave or leaves of absence in excess of one month due to the birth or adoption of
a child(ren) may establish as creditable service the period or periods of unpaid leave in excess of
one month by paying into the annuity savings fund of the applicable retirement system before
any retirement allowance becomes effective for the member, in a lump sum or in installments,
upon the terms and conditions that the applicable board of retirement prescribes, makeup
payments of an amount equal to that which would have been withheld as regular deductions for
the service the employee otherwise would have paid into the retirement system. Such creditable
service buyback shall be limited to a total of two years.
of 1